Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.180

Search warrants.

Should the director be denied access to any premises or establishment where access was sought for the purposes set forth in RCW 16.57.170, the director may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to the premises or establishment for those purposes. The court may upon application, issue the search warrant for the purposes requested.

[ 2003 c 326 s 21; 1959 c 54 s 18.]